Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-532
License; issuance; expiration; renewal; posting requirements.

Upon payment of the license fee and approval by the commission of the application and the bond, certificate of deposit, irrevocable letter of credit, or other security described in section 88-530, the license shall be issued. A new or renewed license shall expire twelve calendar months after the effective date of the issuance or renewal of such license. A license may be kept in continuous force and effect if the warehouse licensee files a proper application for renewal and security which the commission can approve prior to the date of termination.

Notice of the security in the form prescribed by the commission shall be posted in a conspicuous place in each warehouse showing the amount of security on the stored grain. Each warehouse licensee shall also post in a conspicuous place in each warehouse office the storage fees and receiving and load-out fees charged for each type of grain stored.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 31.